Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 2.2 Disability Business Enterprises

37-2.2-1.
Short title and purpose.

This chapter shall be known as the “Disability Business Enterprises Act.” The purpose of this chapter is to carry out the state’s policy of supporting the fullest possible participation of small disadvantaged businesses owned and controlled by persons with disabilities in state funded and state directed public construction, public projects, and in state purchases of goods and services. This includes assisting disadvantaged disability businesses throughout the life of contracts in which they participate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 438, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 150, § 12; P.L. 2004, ch. 257, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 353, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 245, § 1.

37-2.2-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the following meanings unless the context shall indicate another or different meaning or intent:

“Persons with disabilities” or “person with a disability” shall mean any individual who has a physical or mental impairment which constitutes a substantial barrier to employment as certified by the department of human services or the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals.

“Small disadvantaged businesses owned and controlled by persons with disabilities” shall mean small business concern, which is at least fifty-one percent (51%) owned by one or more person(s) with disabilities or, in the case of a publicly owned business, at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the stock of which is owned by one or more disabled person, whose management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more person(s) with disabilities, and have fifty or fewer employees.

“A physical or mental impairment” shall mean any physiological disorder or condition, cosmetic disfigurement, or anatomical loss affecting one or more of the following body systems: neurological; musculoskeletal; special sense organs; respiratory, including speech organs; cardiovascular; reproductive; digestive; genito-urinary; hemic and lymphatic; skin; and endocrine; or any mental psychological disorder, such as mental retardation, organic brain syndrome, emotional or mental illness, and specific learning disabilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 438, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 150, § 12; P.L. 1998, ch. 354, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 257, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 353, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 34; P.L. 2012, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 245, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 101.

37-2.2-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 438, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 268, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 150, § 12; P.L. 1998, ch. 354, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 257, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 353, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2012, ch. 210, § 2, effective June 12, 2012; Repealed by P.L. 2012, ch. 245, § 2, effective June 14, 2012.

37-2.2-3.1.
Policy and applicability.

It is the policy of the state of Rhode Island that small disadvantaged disability businesses shall have the maximum opportunity to participate in the performance of procurements and projects as outlined in this chapter. This chapter shall apply to any and all state purchasing, including, but not limited to, the procurement of goods and services, construction projects, or contracts funded in whole or in part by state funds, or funds which, in accordance with a federal grant or otherwise, the state expends or administers or in which the state is a signatory to the construction contract.

The director of administration, in consultation with the governor’s commission on disabilities, is authorized and directed to establish rules and regulation formulas for awarding contracts to small disadvantaged businesses owned and controlled by persons with disabilities in the procurement of goods, services, construction projects, or contracts funded in whole or in part by state funds, in accordance with §

37-2-9(b)(14)

on or before January 1, 2013.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 150, § 12; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 159; P.L. 2004, ch. 257, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 353, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 34; P.L. 2012, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 245, § 1.

37-2.2-4.
Disability business enterprise committee — Membership — Duties.

There is hereby established within the governor’s commission on disabilities a committee, consisting of seven (7) persons, to be known as the disability business enterprise committee.

The committee, shall consist of the director of the department of human services or his or her designee; the director of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals or his or her designee; the chief executive officer of the Rhode Island commerce corporation or his or her designee; the director of administration or his or her designee; and three (3) persons with disabilities appointed by the chairperson of the governor’s commission on disabilities. All members of the committee shall serve without compensation. Of the number appointed originally under this chapter, one-third (1/3) shall be appointed for a term of one year; one-third (1/3) shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years; and one-third (1/3) shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years. Thereafter, vacancies created by expiration of terms shall be filled with appointments for terms of three (3) years. Members whose terms expire may be reappointed to succeed themselves. The chairperson of the governor’s commission on disabilities or his or her designee shall serve as chairperson of the committee. The members of the committee shall elect a vice chairperson and other officers as are necessary from amongst themselves annually.

The governor’s commission on disabilities shall promulgate such rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42, as are necessary and proper to ensure responsible management, operation, oversight of the committee, and ensure that all businesses referred to in §

37-2.2-3.1

meet all applicable government regulations and standards, including those of the United States department of labor, the state department of human services, and the chief purchasing officer with regard to developing a program which involves small disadvantaged businesses as contractors, §

37-2-9(b)(14)

.

The committee shall establish a procedure to certify small disadvantaged disability businesses that qualify under §

37-2.2-3.1

and submit a list of the certified small disadvantaged disability businesses and the products and services provided by them to the chief purchasing officer at least once a year. The chief purchasing officer shall utilize that procurement list in the program which involves small disadvantaged businesses as contractors established by §

37-2-9(b)(14)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 438, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 268, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 150, § 12; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 159; P.L. 2004, ch. 257, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 353, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 34; P.L. 2012, ch. 210, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 245, § 1.

37-2.2-5.
Nonapplicability to road and highway construction businesses.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any business whose primary business is road or highway construction.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 257, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 353, § 2.